Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5204
Funding; designation of minimum enrollments and priorities.

Funding provided by section 71-5203 shall be sufficient to provide for the following minimal residency enrollments:

(1) During fiscal year 1975-76, funding shall be provided for two hundred eighty-three residencies, including forty-three in the family practice residency program;

(2) During fiscal year 1976-77, funding shall be provided for three hundred seven residencies, including fifty-five in the family practice residency program;

(3) During fiscal year 1977-78, funding shall be provided for three hundred seventeen residencies, including fifty-seven in the family practice residency program;

(4) During fiscal year 1978-79, and each year thereafter, funding shall be provided for three hundred twenty residencies, including sixty in the family practice residency program;

(5) During fiscal year 1975-76 and each year thereafter, funding shall be provided for thirty additional family practice residencies in the State of Nebraska through associated residency programs; and

(6) Any residencies which may be funded, in addition to those provided in this section, shall be family practice residencies. Beginning July 1, 1976, any expansion of residencies, other than family practice residencies, shall be initiated only when the demand for such specialties is shown by patient numbers and need in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1975, LB 571, § 4.